Indiana, session 2026, HB1135.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-20-9.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 9.1. Housing Down Payment Assistance Fund
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "authority" refers to the Indiana
housing and community development authority created by
IC 5-20-1-3.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "fund" refers to the housing
down payment assistance fund established by section 3 of this
chapter.
Sec. 3. (a) The housing down payment assistance fund is
established for the purpose of providing down payment assistance
to buyers purchasing single family residences. The fund shall be
administered by the authority.
(b) The fund consists of:
(1) payments received for taxes imposed under IC 6-8-17-10
and IC 6-8-17-11;
2026 IN 1135—LS 6603/DI 129


(2) payments received for penalties assessed under
IC 6-8-17-15; and
(3) any federal funds received for the purpose of providing
down payment assistance to buyers purchasing single family
residences.
(c) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(d) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that
accrues from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(e) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
Sec. 4. (a) Subject to section 5 of this chapter, the authority shall
do the following:
(1) Adopt guidelines to determine standards for awarding
down payment assistance under this chapter.
(2) Prepare and supervise the issuance of public information
concerning the availability of down payment assistance from
the fund.
(3) Prescribe the form for and regulate the submission of
applications for down payment assistance available under this
chapter.
(b) A buyer may apply for down payment assistance in the
manner prescribed by the authority.
Sec. 5. The authority shall give priority in awarding assistance
from the fund to families seeking assistance to purchase a single
family residence that is sold or transferred by an applicable
taxpayer (as defined in IC 6-8-17-4).
Sec. 6. The authority may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
SECTION 2. IC 6-8-17 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 17. Taxes on Excess Single Family Residential Property
Holdings by Certain Entities
Sec. 0.5. The taxes imposed under:
(1) section 10 of this chapter; and
(2) section 11 of this chapter;
are supplemental to and separate from any property taxes imposed
under IC 6-1.1 on property that is also subject to a tax imposed
under this chapter. The taxes described in subdivisions (1) and (2)
2026 IN 1135—LS 6603/DI 129


are listed taxes and are subject to the provisions of IC 6-8.1.
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "applicable date" means
December 31, 2026. However, in the case of a hedge fund taxpayer
that was not a hedge fund taxpayer in the preceding taxable year,
the term means the last day of the taxable year in the taxable year
immediately preceding the taxable year in which the taxpayer
qualifies as a hedge fund taxpayer.
Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "applicable entity" means a
partnership, corporation, or real estate investment trust.
(b) The term does not include:
(1) an organization that is exempt from federal income
taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code; or
(2) an organization primarily engaged in the construction or
rehabilitation of single family residences.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "applicable single family
residence" means a single family residence that is acquired on or
before the applicable date.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "applicable taxpayer" means an
applicable entity that:
(1) manages funds pooled from investors; and
(2) is a fiduciary with respect to the investors described in
subdivision (1).
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "department" means the
department of state revenue.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "disqualified sale" means any
sale or transfer to:
(1) a corporation or other entity engaged in a trade or
business; or
(2) an individual who owns any other single family residence
at the time of such sale or transfer.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "hedge fund taxpayer" means,
with respect to any taxable year, an applicable taxpayer that has
fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) or more in net value or assets
under its management on any day during the taxable year.
Sec. 8. (a) As used in this chapter, "single family residence"
means a residential property consisting of one (1) to four (4)
dwelling units.
(b) The term does not include:
(1) an unoccupied single family residence acquired through
foreclosure;
(2) a single family residence that is:
2026 IN 1135—LS 6603/DI 129


(A) not rented or leased; and
(B) used as the principal residence of a person who has an
ownership interest in the applicable taxpayer; or
(3) a single family residence constructed, acquired, or
operated with federally appropriated funding sources.
Sec. 9. (a) For purposes of this chapter, an applicable taxpayer
shall be treated as acquiring a single family residence if the
applicable taxpayer acquires a majority ownership interest in the
single family residence, regardless of the percentage of the
ownership interest.
(b) For purposes of this chapter, an applicable taxpayer shall be
treated as owning a single family residence if the applicable
taxpayer owns a majority interest in the single family residence,
regardless of the percentage of the ownership interest.
Sec. 10. Each single family residence acquired by an applicable
taxpayer after the applicable date is subject to a transfer tax equal
to fifty percent (50%) of the fair market value of the single family
residence payable to the department at the time the single family
residence is acquired.
Sec. 11. (a) If the number of applicable single family residences
owned by an applicable taxpayer as of the last day of the taxable
year is more than the maximum permissible units under section 12
of this chapter, the applicable taxpayer is subject to an annual
excise tax equal to the amount determined in STEP FOUR of the
following formula:
STEP ONE: Determine the number of applicable single family
residences owned by the taxpayer as of the last day of the
taxable year.
STEP TWO: Determine the sum of:
(A) zero (0), in the case of a hedge fund taxpayer; or
(B) fifty (50), in the case of any other applicable taxpayer;
plus the maximum permissible units allowed under section 12
of this chapter for the taxable year.
STEP THREE: Subtract the number determined in STEP
TWO from the number determined in STEP ONE.
STEP FOUR: Determine the greater of zero (0) or the product
of:
(A) the number determined in STEP THREE; multiplied
by
(B) fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
(b) A single family residence that is sold or transferred in a
disqualified sale during a taxable year shall be treated as a single
2026 IN 1135—LS 6603/DI 129


family residence that is owned by the applicable taxpayer as of the
last day of the taxable year.
(c) All persons which are treated as a single employer under
Section 52(a) or Section 52(b) of the Internal Revenue Code shall
be treated as a single applicable taxpayer.
(d) The tax imposed under this section is payable to the
department.
Sec. 12. The maximum permissible units for a taxable year is
calculated as follows:
(1) For the first full taxable year beginning after the
applicable date, the following:
(A) For a hedge fund taxpayer, ninety percent (90%) of the
number of applicable single family residences owned by
the hedge fund taxpayer on the applicable date.
(B) For any other applicable taxpayer, fifty (50) plus ninety
percent (90%) of the number of applicable single family
residences owned by the applicable taxpayer on the
applicable date.
(2) For the second taxable year beginning after the applicable
date, the following:
(A) For a hedge fund taxpayer, eighty percent (80%) of the
number of applicable single family residences owned by
the hedge fund taxpayer on the applicable date.
(B) For any other applicable taxpayer, fifty (50) plus eighty
percent (80%) of the number of applicable single family
residences owned by the applicable taxpayer on the
applicable date.
(3) For the third taxable year beginning after the applicable
date, the following:
(A) For a hedge fund taxpayer, seventy percent (70%) of
the number of applicable single family residences owned
by the hedge fund taxpayer on the applicable date.
(B) For any other applicable taxpayer, fifty (50) plus
seventy percent (70%) of the number of applicable single
family residences owned by the applicable taxpayer on the
applicable date.
(4) For the fourth taxable year beginning after the applicable
date, the following:
(A) For a hedge fund taxpayer, sixty percent (60%) of the
number of applicable single family residences owned by
the hedge fund taxpayer on the applicable date.
(B) For any other applicable taxpayer, fifty (50) plus sixty
2026 IN 1135—LS 6603/DI 129


percent (60%) of the number of applicable single family
residences owned by the applicable taxpayer on the
applicable date.
(5) For the fifth taxable year beginning after the applicable
date, the following:
(A) For a hedge fund taxpayer, fifty percent (50%) of the
number of applicable single family residences owned by
the hedge fund taxpayer on the applicable date.
(B) For any other applicable taxpayer, fifty (50) plus fifty
percent (50%) of the number of applicable single family
residences owned by the applicable taxpayer on the
applicable date.
(6) For the sixth taxable year beginning after the applicable
date, the following:
(A) For a hedge fund taxpayer, forty percent (40%) of the
number of applicable single family residences owned by
the hedge fund taxpayer on the applicable date.
(B) For any other applicable taxpayer, fifty (50) plus forty
percent (40%) of the number of applicable single family
residences owned by the applicable taxpayer on the
applicable date.
(7) For the seventh taxable year beginning after the applicable
date, the following:
(A) For a hedge fund taxpayer, thirty percent (30%) of the
number of applicable single family residences owned by
the hedge fund taxpayer on the applicable date.
(B) For any other applicable taxpayer, fifty (50) plus thirty
percent (30%) of the number of applicable single family
residences owned by the applicable taxpayer on the
applicable date.
(8) For the eighth taxable year beginning after the applicable
date, the following:
(A) For a hedge fund taxpayer, twenty percent (20%) of
the number of applicable single family residences owned
by the hedge fund taxpayer on the applicable date.
(B) For any other applicable taxpayer, fifty (50) plus
twenty percent (20%) of the number of applicable single
family residences owned by the applicable taxpayer on the
applicable date.
(9) For the ninth taxable year beginning after the applicable
date, the following:
(A) For a hedge fund taxpayer, ten percent (10%) of the
2026 IN 1135—LS 6603/DI 129


number of applicable single family residences owned by
the hedge fund taxpayer on the applicable date.
(B) For any other applicable taxpayer, fifty (50) plus ten
percent (10%) of the number of applicable single family
residences owned by the applicable taxpayer on the
applicable date.
(10) For a taxable year beginning more than nine (9) years
after the applicable date, the following:
(A) For a hedge fund taxpayer, zero (0) applicable single
family residences.
(B) For any other applicable taxpayer, fifty (50) applicable
single family residences.
Sec. 13. The amounts collected by the department for:
(1) a tax imposed under sections 10 and 11 of this chapter;
and
(2) a penalty assessed under section 15 of this chapter;
must be deposited into the housing down payment assistance fund
established by IC 5-20-9.1-3.
Sec. 14. (a) The department shall require such reporting as the
department deems necessary or appropriate to carry out the
purposes of this chapter, which must include:
(1) the dates on which single family residences owned by an
applicable taxpayer were acquired by the applicable
taxpayer; and
(2) whether a person acquiring a single family residence from
an applicable taxpayer owns any other single family
residences at the time of the acquisition.
(b) The reporting required under subsection (a)(2) must include
a certification from each person to whom a single family residence
is sold or transferred from an applicable taxpayer. The
certification must be signed by the purchaser or transferee and
state:
(1) the name and address of the purchaser or transferee;
(2) that the sale is not a disqualified sale; and
(3) that the purchaser or transferee will be subject to the
penalty imposed under section 15 of this chapter for any false
certification.
Sec. 15. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), an applicable
taxpayer that fails to report the information required under section
14 of this chapter or fails to include correct information in a
report, upon the issuance of notice to the applicable taxpayer of the
failure to comply with this subsection, the applicable taxpayer is
2026 IN 1135—LS 6603/DI 129


subject to a penalty of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) payable
to the department.
(b) A penalty may not be assessed under subsection (a) if it is
shown that an applicable taxpayer's failure to report the
information required under section 14 of this chapter is due to
reasonable cause and not to willful neglect.
(c) Not later than January 31, 2027, the department shall
publish a form on its website to be used for calculating the amount
of tax owed under this chapter.
SECTION 3. IC 6-8.1-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2023,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. "Listed taxes" or "taxes" includes only the
pari-mutuel taxes (IC 4-31-9-3 through IC 4-31-9-5); the supplemental
wagering tax (IC 4-33-12); the riverboat wagering tax (IC 4-33-13); the
slot machine wagering tax (IC 4-35-8); the type II gambling game
excise tax (IC 4-36-9); the gross income tax (IC 6-2.1) (repealed); the
utility receipts and utility services use taxes (IC 6-2.3) (repealed); the
state gross retail and use taxes (IC 6-2.5); the adjusted gross income tax
(IC 6-3); the pass through entity tax (IC 6-3-2.1); the supplemental net
income tax (IC 6-3-8) (repealed); the county adjusted gross income tax
(IC 6-3.5-1.1) (repealed); the county option income tax (IC 6-3.5-6)
(repealed); the county economic development income tax (IC 6-3.5-7)
(repealed); the local income tax (IC 6-3.6); the auto rental excise tax
(IC 6-6-9); the financial institutions tax (IC 6-5.5); the gasoline tax (IC
6-6-1.1); the special fuel tax (IC 6-6-2.5); the motor carrier fuel tax (IC
6-6-4.1); a motor fuel tax collected under a reciprocal agreement under
IC 6-8.1-3; the vehicle excise tax (IC 6-6-5); the aviation fuel excise
tax (IC 6-6-13); the commercial vehicle excise tax (IC 6-6-5.5); the
excise tax imposed on recreational vehicles and truck campers (IC
6-6-5.1); the hazardous waste disposal tax (IC 6-6-6.6) (repealed); the
heavy equipment rental excise tax (IC 6-6-15); the vehicle sharing
excise tax (IC 6-6-16); the cigarette tax (IC 6-7-1); the closed system
cartridge tax (IC 6-7-2-7.5); the electronic cigarette tax (IC 6-7-4); the
beer excise tax (IC 7.1-4-2); the liquor excise tax (IC 7.1-4-3); the wine
excise tax (IC 7.1-4-4); the hard cider excise tax (IC 7.1-4-4.5); the
petroleum severance tax (IC 6-8-1); the taxes imposed on excess
single family residential property holdings (IC 6-8-17); the various
innkeeper's taxes (IC 6-9); the various food and beverage taxes (IC
6-9); the county admissions tax (IC 6-9-13 and IC 6-9-28); the oil
inspection fee (IC 16-44-2); the penalties assessed for oversize vehicles
(IC 9-20-3 and IC 9-20-18); the fees and penalties assessed for
overweight vehicles (IC 9-20-4 and IC 9-20-18); and any other tax or
2026 IN 1135—LS 6603/DI 129


fee that the department is required to collect or administer.
2026 IN 1135—LS 6603/DI 129